Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1909
Electric supplier;
limit on eminent domain.

An electric supplier as
defined in section 70-1001.01 may agree to limit its exercise of the power
of eminent domain to acquire a C-BED project and any related facilities if such electric
supplier enters into a contract to purchase output from such C-BED
project for a term of ten years or more.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB402, § 3.